Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3690.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 301 of Title 19, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Cities and towns shall transmit a copy of any building
permit issued within its boundaries to the county assessor no later
than thirty (30) days after the date of issuance.
B. Cities and towns shall provide the county assessor with
electronic copies of building permits, where available and feasible.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-15846 MAH 12/11/25
Req. No. 15846 Page 1